Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-810
Issuance of bonds; immunity; limitations.

(1) Neither the members of a joint entity's governing body nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on such bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

(2) The bonds shall not be a debt of any political subdivision or of this state and neither this state nor any political subdivision shall be liable thereon. Bonds shall be payable only out of any funds or properties of the issuing joint entity. Such limitations shall be plainly stated upon the face of the bonds.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 10.